Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0217

"Commercial stimulant."

"Commercial stimulant," as used in this chapter, means an activity is operated as a commercial stimulant, for the purposes of this chapter, only when it is an activity operated in connection with an established business, with the purpose of increasing the volume of sales of food or drink for consumption on that business premises. The commission may by rule establish guidelines and criteria for applying this definition to its applicants and licensees for gambling activities authorized by this chapter as commercial stimulants.

[ 1994 c 120 s 1; 1987 c 4 s 6. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(5).]